Louisiana, session 2026, HB641.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 16:483 and 484 are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 16:488
is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§483. Assistant district attorney
The office offices of assistant district attorney attorneys of the
Twenty-Second Judicial District is are created. The minimum number of assistant
district attorneys shall be the number as provided in R.S. 16:51. Any additional
assistant district attorneys shall be appointed by the district attorney of the
Twenty-Second Judicial District and shall serve at the pleasure of the district
attorney.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-693 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 641
§484. Additional salary of assistant district attorney
A. The said assistant district attorney shall receive as compensation for his
services as such officer, in addition to the annual salary paid by the state, an
additional salary of eight thousand dollars per annum, payable monthly on his own
warrant. The additional salary shall be paid by the parishes comprising the
Twenty-Second Judicial District, apportioned as follows:
(1) By the parish of St. Tammany, the sum of four thousand dollars per
annum.
(2) By the parish of Washington, the sum of four thousand dollars per
annum.
B. Provided, in lieu of the payment by the respective parishes as set forth in
Subsection A of this Section, the said additional salary may be paid from the
criminal court funds of the respective parishes where the money is available from
such funds, all according to law.
A. The assistant district attorneys of the Twenty-Second Judicial District
shall receive, in addition to any salary paid to them by the state, an annual salary as
set by the district attorney from the annual budgeted funds provided by the governing
authorities of the parishes comprising the Twenty-Second Judicial District for
salaries for assistant district attorneys. The salaries shall be set for each assistant
district attorney by the district attorney at his discretion. The total amount of the
budgeted salary funds for the assistant district attorneys shall not be reduced after
being in effect for a period of six months. The salaries shall be paid monthly on
warrant of the district attorney.
B. The governing authorities of the parishes comprising the Twenty-Second
Judicial District shall annually, at the time they prepare the general budget, budget
an amount sufficient to pay the salaries of the assistant district attorneys.
* * *
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-693 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 641
§488. Expenses; operating budget
A. In addition to the expense allowance provided by R.S. 16:6, the district
attorney of the Twenty-Second Judicial District is entitled to an operating budget,
paid by the governing authorities of the parishes comprising the Twenty-Second
Judicial District, for the expenses of the operation of the office of the district
attorney. Such expenses shall include but are not limited to the following:
(1) Salaries of stenographers, clerks, administrators, secretaries, and
investigators.
(2) Salaries of assistant district attorneys, as provided by R.S. 16:484.
(3) Expenses for stationery, telephones, automobiles, office equipment, and
office supplies.
(4) Funds for matching federal grants, parochial retirement coverage for
employees, as provided by law, and hospitalization insurance coverage for
employees, as provided to other employees of the parish.
(5) Travel expenses where appropriate for operation of the office or for
training seminars and registrations for seminars, schools, and professional societies.
(6) Any other expenses which may be incurred in the normal operation of the
office of the district attorney.
B. All such expenses shall be paid by the governing authorities of the
parishes comprising the Twenty-Second Judicial District from their general funds
and any other funds made available for this purpose.
C. The operating budget shall not be reduced without the consent of the
district attorney during the year in which it is effective, nor shall the district
attorney's annual budget for any year be less than the annual budget for the preceding
year without the consent of the district attorney, except in the case of a pro rata
reduction in the operating budgets of all other departments in a parish comprising the
Twenty-Second Judicial District due to reduction in revenues. This Subsection does
not apply to the capital outlay portion of the annual budget for the office of the
district attorney provided that, for purposes of this Subsection, the capital outlay
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-693 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 641
portion of the budget does not include office equipment, furniture, communication
equipment, expenses associated with maintaining a law library, and computer
systems.
Section 2. R.S. 16:485 through 487 are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.